Massachusetts, session 194th, H2032.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The second paragraph of section 39D of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 2 sentences:- The
petition shall include a verified complaint that the allegations therein are made on personal
knowledge, set forth facts that would be admissible in evidence, affirmatively show the affiant's
competence to testify on the matters therein, and are not conclusory. Upon the filing of the
petition, the court shall, at the sole expense of the petitioning grandparent and without input from
any party, appoint a guardian ad litem for the minor child pursuant to section 56A of chapter 215
and assign the issue of grandparent visitation for mediation.
of 1